Illinois, session 104th, HB3331.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regulatory Sunset Act is amended by 5changing Section 4.36 and adding Section 4.43 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 80/4.36)7    Sec. 4.36. Acts repealed on January 1, 2026. The following 8Acts are repealed on January 1, 2026: 9    The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, and 10Nail Technology Act of 1985.11    The Collection Agency Act.12    The Hearing Instrument Consumer Protection Act.13    The Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act.14    The Illinois Dental Practice Act. 15    The Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act.16    The Illinois Physical Therapy Act.17    The Professional Geologist Licensing Act.18    The Respiratory Care Practice Act.19(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15; 99-204, eff. 7-30-15; 2099-227, eff. 8-3-15; 99-229, eff. 8-3-15; 99-230, eff. 8-3-15; 2199-427, eff. 8-21-15; 99-469, eff. 8-26-15; 99-492, eff. 2212-31-15; 99-642, eff. 7-28-16.)   HB3331- 2 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1    (5 ILCS 80/4.43 new)2    Sec. 4.43. Act repealed on January 1, 2031. The following 3Act is repealed on January 1, 2031: 4    The Professional Geologist Licensing Act. 5    Section 15. The Professional Geologist Licensing Act is 6amended by changing Sections 15, 20, 25, 30, 35, 40, 45, 50, 754, 65, 75, 80, 85, 90, 110, 120, 125, 140, 160, and 180 and by 8adding Sections 18, 41, and 66 as follows: 9    (225 ILCS 745/15)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)11    Sec. 15. Definitions. In this Act:12    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 13by the Department in the applicant's application file or the 14licensee's license file, as maintained by the Department's 15licensure maintenance unit.16    "Email address of record" means the designated email 17address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 18application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 19by the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 20    "Board" means the Board of Licensing for Professional 21Geologists.22    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 23Professional Regulation.24    "Geologist" means an individual who, by reason of the   HB3331- 3 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1individual's his or her knowledge of geology, mathematics, and 2the physical and life sciences, acquired by education and 3practical experience as defined by this Act, is capable of 4practicing the science of geology.5    "Geology" means the science that includes the treatment of 6the earth and its origin and history including, but not 7limited to, (i) the investigation of the earth's crust and 8interior and the solids and fluids, including all surface and 9underground waters, gases, and other materials that compose 10the earth as they may relate to geologic processes; (ii) the 11study of the natural agents, forces, and processes that cause 12changes in the earth; and (iii) the utilization of this 13knowledge of the earth and its solids, fluids, and gases, and 14their collective properties and processes, for the benefit of 15humankind.16    "Person" or "individual" means a natural person.17    "Practice of professional geology" means the performance 18of, or the offer to perform, the services of a geologist, 19including consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, 20mapping, inspection of geologic work, and other services that 21require extensive knowledge of geologic laws, formulas, 22principles, practice, and methods of data interpretation.23    Any A person shall be construed to practice or offer to 24practice professional geology, within the meaning and intent 25of this Act, if the that person (i) by verbal claim, sign, 26advertisement, letterhead, card, or any other means,   HB3331- 4 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1represents oneself himself or herself to be a Licensed 2Professional Geologist or through the use of some title 3implies that the person he or she is a Licensed Professional 4Geologist or is licensed under this Act or (ii) holds oneself 5himself or herself out as able to perform or does perform 6services or work defined in this Act as the practice of 7professional geology.8    Examples of the practice of professional geology include, 9but are not limited to, the conduct of, or responsible charge 10for, the following types of activities: (i) mapping, sampling, 11and analysis of earth materials, interpretation of data, and 12the preparation of oral or written testimony regarding the 13probable geological causes of events; (ii) planning, review, 14and supervision of data gathering activities, interpretation 15of geological data gathered by direct and indirect means, 16preparation and interpretation of geological maps, 17cross-sections, interpretive maps and reports for the purpose 18of determining regional or site specific geological 19conditions; (iii) the planning, review, and supervision of 20data gathering activities and interpretation of data on 21regional or site specific geological characteristics affecting 22groundwater; (iv) the interpretation of geological conditions 23on the surface of the Earth and at depth in the Earth for the 24purpose of determining whether those conditions correspond to 25a geologic map of the site or a legally specified geological 26requirement for the site; and (v) the conducting of   HB3331- 5 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1environmental property audits.2    "Licensed Professional Geologist" means an individual who 3is licensed under this Act to engage in the practice of 4professional geology in Illinois.5    "Responsible charge" means the independent control and 6direction, by use of initiative, skill, and independent 7judgment, of geological work or the supervision of that work.8    "Rules" means the rules adopted pursuant to this Act. 9    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 10Professional Regulation. 11    "Seal" means the seal in compliance with Section 60 of 12this Act. 13(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 14    (225 ILCS 745/18 new)15    Sec. 18. Address of record; email address of record. All 16applicants and licensees shall:17        (1) provide a valid address and email address to the 18    Department, which shall serve as the address of record and 19    email address of record, respectively, at the time of 20    application for licensure or renewal of a license; and21        (2) inform the Department of any change of address of 22    record or email address of record within 14 days after 23    such change either through the Department's website or by 24    contacting the Department's licensure maintenance unit.   HB3331- 6 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1    (225 ILCS 745/20)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 20. Exemptions. Nothing in this Act shall be 4construed to restrict the use of the title "geologist" or 5similar words by any person engaged in a practice of geology 6exempted under this Act, provided the person does not hold the 7person himself or herself out as being a Licensed Professional 8Geologist or does not practice professional geology in a 9manner requiring licensure under this Act. Performance of the 10following activities does not require licensure as a licensed 11professional geologist under this Act:12        (a) The practice of professional geology by an 13    employee or a subordinate of a licensee under this Act, 14    provided the work does not include responsible charge of 15    geological work and is performed under the direct 16    supervision of a Licensed Professional Geologist who is 17    responsible for the work.18        (b) The practice of professional geology by officers 19    and employees of the United States government within the 20    scope of their employment.21        (c) The practice of professional geology as geologic 22    research to advance basic knowledge for the purpose of 23    offering scientific papers, publications, or other 24    presentations (i) before meetings of scientific societies, 25    (ii) internal to a partnership, corporation, 26    proprietorship, or government agency, or (iii) for   HB3331- 7 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1    publication in scientific journals, or in books.2        (d) The teaching of geology in schools, colleges, or 3    universities, as defined by rule.4        (e) The practice of professional geology exclusively 5    in the exploration for or development of energy resources 6    or base, precious and nonprecious minerals, including 7    sand, gravel, and aggregate, that does not require, by 8    law, rule, or ordinance, the submission of reports, 9    documents, or oral or written testimony to public 10    agencies. Public agencies may, by law or by rule, allow 11    required oral or written testimony, reports, permit 12    applications, or other documents based on the science of 13    geology to be submitted to them by persons not licensed 14    under this Act. Unless otherwise required by State or 15    federal law, public agencies may not require that the 16    geology-based aspects of testimony, reports, permits, or 17    other documents so exempted be reviewed by, approved, or 18    otherwise certified by any person who is not a Licensed 19    Professional Geologist. Licensure is not required for the 20    submission and review of reports or documents or the 21    provision of oral or written testimony made under the Well 22    Abandonment Act, the Illinois Oil and Gas Act, the Surface 23    Coal Mining Land Conservation and Reclamation Act, or the 24    Surface-Mined Land Conservation and Reclamation Act.25        (f) The practice of professional engineering as 26    defined in the Professional Engineering Practice Act of   HB3331- 8 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1    1989.2        (g) The practice of structural engineering as defined 3    in the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989.4        (h) The practice of architecture as defined in the 5    Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 1989.6        (i) The practice of land surveying as defined in the 7    Illinois Professional Land Surveyor Act of 1989.8        (j) The practice of landscape architecture as defined 9    in the Landscape Architecture Registration Act.10        (k) The practice of professional geology for a period 11    not to exceed 9 months by any person pursuing a course of 12    study leading to a degree in geology from an accredited 13    college or university, as set forth in this Act and as 14    established by rule, provided that (i) such practice 15    constitutes a part of a supervised course of study, (ii) 16    the person is under the supervision of a geologist 17    licensed under this Act or a teacher of geology at an 18    accredited college or university, and (iii) the person is 19    designated by a title that clearly indicates the person's 20    his or her status as a student or trainee. 21(Source: P.A. 102-284, eff. 8-6-21.) 22    (225 ILCS 745/25)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)24    Sec. 25. Restrictions and limitations. No person shall, 25without a valid license issued by the Department (i) in any   HB3331- 9 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1manner hold oneself himself or herself out to the public as a 2Licensed Professional Geologist; (ii) attach the title 3"Licensed Professional Geologist" to the person's his or her 4name; or (iii) render or offer to render to individuals, 5corporations, or public agencies services constituting the 6practice of professional geology.7(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 8    (225 ILCS 745/30)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)10    Sec. 30. Powers and duties of the Department. Subject to 11the provisions of this Act, the Department may:12        (a) Authorize examinations to ascertain the 13    qualifications and fitness of applicants for licensing as 14    a Licensed Professional Geologist or as a Licensed 15    Specialty Geologist, as defined by the Board, and pass 16    upon the qualifications of applicants for licensure by 17    endorsement.18        (b) Conduct hearings on proceedings to refuse to issue 19    or renew licenses or to revoke, suspend, place on 20    probation, reprimand, or take any other disciplinary or 21    non-disciplinary action against licenses issued under this 22    Act.23        (c) Formulate rules required for the administration of 24    this Act.25        (d) Obtain written recommendations from the Board   HB3331- 10 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1    regarding (i) definitions of curriculum content and 2    approval of geological curricula, standards of 3    professional conduct, and formal disciplinary actions and 4    the formulation of rules affecting these matters and (ii) 5    when petitioned by the applicant, opinions regarding the 6    qualifications of applicants for licensing.7        (e) Issue licenses to applicants who meet the 8    requirements of this Act. Maintain rosters of the names 9    and addresses of all licensees, and all persons whose 10    licenses have been suspended, revoked, denied renewal, or 11    otherwise disciplined within the previous calendar year. 12    These rosters shall be available upon written request and 13    payment of the required fee.14(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 15    (225 ILCS 745/35)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)17    Sec. 35. Board of Licensing for Professional Geologists; 18members; qualifications; duties.19    (a) The Secretary shall appoint a Board of Licensing for 20Professional Geologists which shall serve in an advisory 21capacity to the Secretary. The Board shall be composed of 8 22persons, 7 of whom shall be voting members appointed by the 23Secretary, who shall give due consideration to recommendations 24by members of the profession of geology and of geology 25organizations within the State. In addition, the State   HB3331- 11 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1Geologist or the State Geologist's his or her designated 2representative, shall be an advisory, non-voting member of the 3Board.4    (b) Insofar as possible, the geologists appointed to serve 5on the Board shall be generally representative of the 6occupational and geographical distribution of geologists 7within this State.8    (c) Of the 7 appointed voting members of the Board, 6 shall 9be geologists and one shall be a member of the general public 10with no family or business connection with the practice of 11geology.12    (d) Each of the appointed geologist members of the Board 13shall be a Licensed Professional Geologist licensed under this 14Act with at least 10 years of experience and shall not have 15been disciplined within the last 10 years under this Act.16    (e) Voting members shall be appointed to 4-year terms. 17Partial terms of over 2 years in length shall be considered 18full terms.19    (f) Members shall hold office until the expiration of 20their terms or until their successors have been appointed and 21have qualified.22    (g) No voting member of the Board shall serve more than 2 23consecutive full terms.24    (h) Vacancies in the membership of the Board shall be 25filled by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.26    (i) The Secretary may remove or suspend any appointed   HB3331- 12 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1member of the Board for cause at any time before the expiration 2of the member's his or her term. The Secretary shall be the 3sole arbiter of cause.4    (j) The Board shall annually elect one of its members as 5chairperson and one of its members as vice-chair.6    (k) The members of the Board shall be reimbursed for all 7legitimate and necessary expenses authorized by the Department 8incurred in attending the meetings of the Board.9    (l) The Board may make recommendations to the Secretary to 10establish the examinations and their method of grading.11    (m) The Board may submit written recommendations to the 12Secretary concerning formulation of rules and a Code of 13Professional Conduct and Ethics. The Board may recommend or 14endorse revisions and amendments to the Code and to the rules 15from time to time.16    (n) The Board may make recommendations on matters relating 17to continuing education of Licensed Professional Geologists, 18including the number of hours necessary for license renewal, 19waivers for those unable to meet that requirement, and 20acceptable course content. These recommendations shall not 21impose an undue burden on the Department or an unreasonable 22restriction on those seeking a license renewal.23    (o) Four voting Board members constitutes a quorum. A 24quorum is required for all Board decisions. 25(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.)   HB3331- 13 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1    (225 ILCS 745/40)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 40. Application for original license. 4    (a) Applications for original licenses shall be made to 5the Department on physical or electronic forms prescribed by 6the Department and accompanied by the required fee, which 7shall not be refundable. All applications shall contain the 8information that, in the judgment of the Department, will 9enable the Department to pass on the qualifications of the 10applicant for a license to practice as a Licensed Professional 11Geologist.12    (b) The Department may require an applicant, at the 13applicant's expense, to have an evaluation of the applicant's 14education in a foreign country by a nationally recognized 15evaluation service approved by the Department in accordance 16with rules adopted by the Department.17    (c) Applicants have 3 years from the date of receipt of the 18application to complete the application process. If the 19process has not been completed in 3 years, the application 20shall be denied, the fee shall be forfeited, and the applicant 21must reapply and meet the requirements in effect at the time of 22reapplication. 23(Source: P.A. 96-1327, eff. 7-27-10.) 24    (225 ILCS 745/41 new)25    Sec. 41. Social Security Number or Individual Taxpayer   HB3331- 14 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1Identification Number on license application. In addition to 2any other information required to be contained in the 3application, every application for an original license under 4this Act shall include the applicant's Social Security Number 5or Individual Taxpayer Identification Number, which shall be 6retained in the agency's records pertaining to the license. As 7soon as practical, the Department shall assign a customer's 8identification number to each applicant for a license.9    Every application for a renewal or restored license shall 10require the applicant's customer identification number. 11    (225 ILCS 745/45)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 45. Examination; failure or refusal to take the 14examination. 15    (a) The Department shall authorize examinations of 16applicants for original licensure as a Professional Geologist 17at such times and places as it may determine. The examination 18for licensure as a Licensed Professional Geologist shall be a 192-part examination, with one part fairly testing an 20applicant's knowledge of the fundamental theory and concepts 21of the science of geology, including subjects that are 22generally taught in geology curricula of accredited colleges 23and universities, and the other part testing the applicant's 24knowledge of the practical application and uses of the theory 25and science of geology. The 2 parts of the examination may be   HB3331- 15 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1taken at separate times. 2    (b) Applicants for examinations shall pay, either to the 3Department or to the designated testing service, a fee 4covering the cost of providing the examination. Failure to 5appear for the examination on the scheduled date at the time 6and place specified after the application for examination has 7been received and acknowledged by the Department or the 8designated testing service shall result in forfeiture of the 9examination fee.10    (c) If the applicant neglects, fails, or refuses to take 11an examination or fails to pass an examination for a license 12under this Act within 3 years 6 years after filing an 13application, the application shall be denied. However, the 14applicant may thereafter submit a new application accompanied 15by the required fee. The applicant shall meet the requirements 16in force at the time of making the new application.17    (d) The Department may employ consultants for the purpose 18of preparing and conducting examinations.19    (e) The Department shall have the authority to adopt or 20recognize, in part or in whole, examinations prepared, 21administered, or graded by other organizations that are 22determined appropriate to measure the qualifications of an 23applicant for licensure as a Licensed Professional Geologist.24(Source: P.A. 96-1327, eff. 7-27-10.) 25    (225 ILCS 745/50)  HB3331- 16 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)2    Sec. 50. Qualifications for licensure. 3    (a) The Department may issue a license to practice as a 4Licensed Professional Geologist to any applicant who meets the 5following qualifications:6        (1) The applicant has completed an application form 7    and paid the required fees.8        (2) The applicant is of good ethical character, 9    including compliance with the Code of Professional Conduct 10    and Ethics under this Act, and has not committed any act or 11    offense in any jurisdiction that would constitute the 12    basis for disciplining a Licensed Professional Geologist 13    under this Act.14        (3) The applicant has earned a degree in geology or a 15    related science, as defined by rule, from an accredited 16    college or university, as established by rule, with a 17    minimum of 30 semester or 45 quarter hours of course 18    credits in geology, of which 24 semester or 36 quarter 19    hours are in upper level courses. The Department may, upon 20    the recommendation of the Board, allow the substitution of 21    appropriate experience as a geologist for prescribed 22    educational requirements as established by rule. 23        (4) The applicant has a documented record of a minimum 24    of 4 years of professional experience, obtained after 25    completion of the education requirements specified in this 26    Section, in geologic or directly related work,   HB3331- 17 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1    demonstrating that the applicant is qualified to assume 2    responsible charge of such work upon licensure as a 3    Licensed Professional Geologist or such specialty of 4    professional geology that the Board may recommend and the 5    Department may recognize. The Department may require 6    evidence acceptable to it that up to 2 years of 7    professional experience have been gained under the 8    supervision of a person licensed under this Act or similar 9    Acts in any other state, or under the supervision of 10    others who, in the opinion of the Department, are 11    qualified to have responsible charge of geological work 12    under this Act.13        (5) The applicant has passed both parts of the an 14    examination authorized by the Department for practice as a 15    Licensed Professional Geologist.16        (6) The applicant has complied with all other 17    requirements of this Act and rules established for the 18    implementation of this Act.19    (b) A license to practice as a Licensed Professional 20Geologist shall not be denied any applicant because of the 21applicant's race, religion, creed, national origin, political 22beliefs or activities, age, sex, sexual orientation, or 23physical impairment.24    (c) The Department may establish by rule an intern process 25to, in part, allow (1) a graduate who has earned a degree in 26geology from an accredited college or university in accordance   HB3331- 18 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1with this Act or (2) a student in a degree program at an 2accredited college or university who has completed the 3necessary course requirements established in this Section to 4request to take one or both parts of the examination required 5by the Department without first submitting a formal 6application to the Department for licensure as a Licensed 7Professional Geologist. The Department may set by rule the 8criteria for the intern process, including, but not limited 9to, the educational requirements, exam requirements, 10experience requirements, remediation requirements, and any 11fees or applications required for the process. The Department 12may also set by rule provisions concerning disciplinary 13guidelines and the use of the title "intern" or "trainee" by a 14graduate or student who has passed the required examination. 15(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 16    (225 ILCS 745/54)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)18    Sec. 54. Endorsement Previous qualification in other 19jurisdiction. The Department may, upon the recommendation of 20the Board, issue a license by endorsement to any applicant 21who, upon applying to the Department and remitting the 22required application fee, meets all of the following 23qualifications: 24        (1) The applicant holds an active, valid license to 25    practice professional geology in at least one jurisdiction   HB3331- 19 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1    in the United States in which the current requirements for 2    licensure are substantially equivalent to or more 3    stringent than those required by this Act. 4        (2) The applicant is of good ethical character as 5    established by the Department in the Code of Professional 6    Conduct and Ethics under this Act and has not committed 7    any act or offense in any jurisdiction that would 8    constitute the basis for discipline under this Act. 9        (3) The applicant has met any other qualifications 10    recommended to the Department by the Board.11    An applicant has 3 years from the date of application to 12complete the application process. If the process has not been 13completed within this 3 year period, then the application 14shall be denied, the fee shall be forfeited, and the applicant 15must re-apply and meet the requirements in effect at the time 16of re-application. 17(Source: P.A. 96-1327, eff. 7-27-10.) 18    (225 ILCS 745/65)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)20    Sec. 65. Expiration and renewal of license. The expiration 21date and renewal period for each license shall be set by rule. 22A Licensed Professional Geologist whose license has expired 23may reinstate the his or her license or enrollment at any time 24within 5 years after the expiration thereof, by making a 25renewal application and by paying the required fee. However,   HB3331- 20 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1any Licensed Professional Geologist whose license expired 2while the Licensed Professional Geologist he or she was (i) on 3active duty with the Armed Forces of the United States or 4called into service or training by the State militia or (ii) in 5training or education under the supervision of the United 6States preliminary to induction into the military service, may 7have the his or her Licensed Professional Geologist license 8renewed, reinstated, or restored without paying any lapsed 9renewal fees if within 2 years after termination of the 10service, training, or education the Licensed Professional 11Geologist furnishes to the Department satisfactory evidence of 12the service, training, or education and that it has been 13terminated under honorable conditions.14    Any Licensed Professional Geologist whose license has 15expired for more than 5 years may have it restored by making 16application to the Department, paying the required fee, and 17filing acceptable proof of fitness to have the license 18restored. The proof may include sworn evidence certifying 19active practice in another jurisdiction. If the geologist has 20not practiced for 5 years or more, the Board shall determine by 21an evaluation program established by rule, whether that 22individual is fit to resume active status as a Licensed 23Professional Geologist. The Board may require the geologist to 24complete a period of evaluated professional experience and may 25require successful completion of an examination.26    The Department may refuse to issue or may suspend the   HB3331- 21 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1license of any person who fails to file a tax return, or to pay 2the tax, penalty, or interest shown in a filed return, or to 3pay any final assessment of tax, penalty, or interest, as 4required by any tax Act administered by the Illinois 5Department of Revenue, until such time as the requirements of 6any such tax Act are satisfied.7(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 8    (225 ILCS 745/66 new)9    Sec. 66. Inactive status. A person licensed under this Act 10who notifies the Department in writing on forms prescribed by 11the Department may place the person's license on inactive 12status and shall be excused from the payment of renewal fees 13until the Department is notified in writing of the person's 14desire to resume active status.15    Any licensed geologist whose license is in inactive status 16shall not practice professional geology in this State. 17    (225 ILCS 745/75)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)19    Sec. 75. Returned checks; fines. Any person who delivers a 20check or other payment to the Department that is returned to 21the Department unpaid by the financial institution upon which 22it is drawn shall pay to the Department, in addition to the 23amount already owed to the Department, a fine of $50. The fines 24imposed by this Section are in addition to any other   HB3331- 22 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1discipline provided under this Act for unlicensed practice or 2practice on a nonrenewed license. The Department shall notify 3the person that payment of fees and fines shall be paid to the 4Department by certified check or money order within 30 5calendar days of the notification. If, after the expiration of 630 calendar days from the date of the notification, the person 7has failed to submit the necessary remittance, the Department 8shall automatically terminate the license or deny the 9application, without a hearing. If, after termination or 10denial, the person seeks a license to practice as a Licensed 11Professional Geologist, the person he or she shall apply to 12the Department for restoration or issuance of the license and 13pay all fees and fines due to the Department. The Department 14may establish a fee for the processing of an application for 15restoration of a license to pay all expenses of processing 16this application. The Secretary may waive the fines due under 17this Section in individual cases where the Secretary finds 18that the fines would be unreasonable or unnecessarily 19burdensome.20(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 21    (225 ILCS 745/80)22    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)23    Sec. 80. Disciplinary actions. 24    (a) The Department may refuse to issue or renew, or may 25revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand, or take other   HB3331- 23 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1disciplinary or non-disciplinary action as the Department may 2deem appropriate, including fines not to exceed $10,000 for 3each violation, with regard to any license for any one or 4combination of the following:5        (1) Material misstatement in furnishing information to 6    the Department.7        (2) Violations of this Act, or of the rules 8    promulgated under this Act.9        (3) Conviction by plea of guilty or nolo contendere, 10    finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of judgment or by 11    sentencing of any crime, including, but not limited to, 12    convictions, preceding sentences of supervision, 13    conditional discharge, or first offender probation, under 14    the laws of any jurisdiction of the United States: (i) 15    that is a felony or (ii) that is a misdemeanor, an 16    essential element of which is dishonesty, or that is 17    directly related to the practice of the profession.18        (4) Making any misrepresentation for the purpose of 19    obtaining licensure or violating any provision of this Act 20    or the rules promulgated under this Act pertaining to 21    advertising.22        (5) Professional incompetence.23        (6) Malpractice.24        (7) Aiding or assisting another person in violating 25    any provision of this Act or rules promulgated under this 26    Act.  HB3331- 24 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1        (8) Failing, within 60 days, to provide information in 2    response to a written request made by the Department.3        (9) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 4    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 5    defraud, or harm the public.6        (10) Habitual or excessive use or addiction to 7    alcohol, narcotics, stimulants, or any other chemical 8    agent or drug that results in the inability to practice 9    with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety.10        (11) Discipline by another state, the District of 11    Columbia, a territory of the United States, or a foreign 12    nation, if at least one of the grounds for the discipline 13    is the same or substantially equivalent to those set forth 14    in this Section.15        (12) Directly or indirectly giving to or receiving 16    from any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or 17    association any fee, commission, rebate or other form of 18    compensation for professional services not actually or 19    personally rendered.20        (13) A finding by the Department that the licensee, 21    after having a his or her license placed on probationary 22    status, has violated the terms of probation.23        (14) Willfully making or filing false records or 24    reports in the person's his or her practice, including but 25    not limited to, false records filed with State agencies or 26    departments.  HB3331- 25 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1        (15) Physical illness, including but not limited to, 2    deterioration through the aging process, or loss of motor 3    skill that results in the inability to practice the 4    profession with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety.5        (16) Solicitation of professional services other than 6    permitted advertising.7        (17) Conviction of or cash compromise of a charge or 8    violation of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act 9    regulating narcotics.10        (18) Failure to (i) file a tax return, (ii) pay the 11    tax, penalty, or interest shown in a filed return, or 12    (iii) pay any final assessment of tax, penalty, or 13    interest, as required by any tax Act administered by the 14    Illinois Department of Revenue, until the requirements of 15    that tax Act are satisfied.16        (19) Conviction by any court of competent 17    jurisdiction, either within or outside this State, of any 18    violation of any law governing the practice of 19    professional geology, if the Department determines, after 20    investigation, that the person has not been sufficiently 21    rehabilitated to warrant the public trust.22        (20) Gross, willful, or continued overcharging for 23    professional services, including filing false statements 24    for collection of fees for which services are not 25    rendered.26        (21) Practicing under a false or, except as provided   HB3331- 26 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1    by law, an assumed name.2        (22) Fraud or misrepresentation in applying for, or 3    procuring, a license to practice as a Licensed 4    Professional Geologist under this Act or in connection 5    with applying for renewal of a license under this Act.6        (23) Cheating on or attempting to subvert the 7    licensing examination administered under this Act.8    (b) The determination by a circuit court that a licensee 9is subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission as 10provided in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 11Code operates as an automatic suspension. The suspension will 12end only upon a finding by a court that the licensee is no 13longer subject to the involuntary admission or judicial 14admission and issues an order so finding and discharging the 15licensee; and upon the recommendation of the Board to the 16Secretary that the licensee be allowed to resume the 17licensee's his or her practice.18    All fines imposed under this Section shall be paid within 1960 days after the effective date of the order imposing the fine 20or in accordance with the terms set forth in the order imposing 21the fine. 22(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 23    (225 ILCS 745/85)24    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)25    Sec. 85. Injunctive action; cease and desist order.   HB3331- 27 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1    (a) If any person violates the provisions of this Act, the 2Director, in the name of the People of the State of Illinois, 3through the Attorney General or the State's Attorney of the 4county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred, may 5petition for an order enjoining the violation or for an order 6enforcing compliance with this Act. Upon the filing of a 7verified petition, the court with appropriate jurisdiction may 8issue a temporary restraining order, without notice or bond, 9and may preliminarily and permanently enjoin the violation. If 10it is established that the person has violated or is violating 11the injunction, the court may punish the offender for contempt 12of court. Proceedings under this Section are in addition to, 13and not in lieu of, all other remedies and penalties provided 14by this Act.15    (b) If any a person practices as a Licensed Professional 16Geologist or holds oneself himself or herself out as a 17Licensed Professional Geologist in Illinois, without being 18licensed to do so under this Act, then any Licensed 19Professional Geologist, interested party, or any person 20injured thereby may petition for relief as provided in 21subsection (a) of this Section.22    (c) Whenever, in the opinion of the Department, a person 23violates any provision of this Act, the Department may issue a 24rule to show cause why an order to cease and desist should not 25be entered against that person. The rule shall clearly set 26forth the grounds relied upon by the Department and shall   HB3331- 28 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1allow at least 7 days from the date of the rule to file an 2answer satisfactory to the Department. Failure to answer to 3the satisfaction of the Department shall cause an order to 4cease and desist to be issued.5(Source: P.A. 96-1327, eff. 7-27-10.) 6    (225 ILCS 745/90)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 90. Investigations; notice and hearing. The 9Department may investigate the actions of any applicant or of 10any person or persons rendering or offering to render 11geological services or any person holding or claiming to hold 12a license as a Licensed Professional Geologist. The Department 13shall, before revoking, suspending, placing on probation, 14reprimanding, or taking any other disciplinary action under 15Section 80 of this Act, at least 30 days before the date set 16for the hearing, (i) notify the accused in writing of the 17charges made and the time and place for the hearing on the 18charges, (ii) direct the accused him or her to file a written 19answer to the charges with the Board under oath within 20 days 20after the service on the accused him or her of the notice, and 21(iii) notify the accused that, if the accused he or she fails 22to answer, default will be taken against the accused him or 23her, and that the his or her license may be suspended, revoked, 24placed on probationary status, or other disciplinary action 25taken with regard to the license, including limiting the   HB3331- 29 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1scope, nature, or extent of the accused's his or her practice, 2as the Department may consider proper. At the time and place 3fixed in the notice, the Board shall proceed to hear the 4charges and the parties or their counsel shall be accorded 5ample opportunity to present any pertinent statements, 6testimony, evidence, and arguments. The Board may continue the 7hearing from time to time. In case the person, after receiving 8the notice, fails to file an answer, the person's his or her 9license may, in the discretion of the Department, be 10suspended, revoked, placed on probationary status, or subject 11to any other disciplinary action the Department considers 12proper, including limiting the scope, nature, or extent of the 13person's practice or the imposition of a fine, without a 14hearing, if the act or acts charged constitute sufficient 15grounds for that action under this Act. The written notice may 16be served by personal delivery or by certified mail or by email 17to the licensee's address of record or email address of 18record.19(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 20    (225 ILCS 745/110)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)22    Sec. 110. Findings and recommendations. At the conclusion 23of the hearing, the Board shall present to the Secretary a 24written report of its findings of fact, conclusions of law, 25and recommendations. The report shall contain a finding   HB3331- 30 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1whether or not the accused person violated this Act or its 2rules or failed to comply with the conditions required in this 3Act or its rules. The Board shall specify the nature of any 4violations or failure to comply and shall make its 5recommendations to the Secretary. In making recommendations 6for any disciplinary actions, the Board may take into 7consideration all facts and circumstances bearing upon the 8reasonableness of the conduct of the accused and the potential 9for future harm to the public, including but not limited to 10previous discipline of the accused by the Department, intent, 11degree of harm to the public and likelihood of harm in the 12future, any restitution made by the accused, and whether the 13incident or incidents contained in the complaint appear to be 14isolated or represent a continuing pattern of conduct. In 15making its recommendations for discipline, the Board shall 16endeavor to ensure that the severity of the discipline 17recommended is reasonably related to the severity of the 18violation.19    The report of findings of fact, conclusions of law, and 20recommendation of the Board shall be the basis for the 21Department's order refusing to issue, restore, or renew a 22person's license to practice as a Licensed Professional 23Geologist, or otherwise disciplining a licensee. If the 24Secretary disagrees with the recommendations of the Board, the 25Secretary may issue an order in contravention of the Board 26recommendations. The Secretary shall provide a written report   HB3331- 31 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1to the Board on any disagreement and shall specify the reasons 2for the action in the final order. The finding is not 3admissible in evidence against the person in a criminal 4prosecution brought for a violation of this Act, but the 5hearing and finding are not a bar to a criminal prosecution 6brought for a violation of this Act.7(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 8    (225 ILCS 745/120)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)10    Sec. 120. Secretary; rehearing. Whenever the Secretary 11believes that justice has not been done in the revocation, 12suspension, or refusal to issue, restore, or renew a person's 13license to practice as a Licensed Professional Geologist, or 14other discipline of an applicant or licensee, the Secretary he 15or she may order a rehearing by the same or other examiners.16(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 17    (225 ILCS 745/125)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)19    Sec. 125. Appointment of a hearing officer. The Secretary 20has the authority to appoint any attorney licensed to practice 21law in the State of Illinois to serve as the hearing officer in 22any action for refusal to issue, restore, or renew a person's 23license to practice as a Licensed Professional Geologist or to 24discipline a licensee. The hearing officer has full authority   HB3331- 32 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1to conduct the hearing. Members of the Board may attend each 2hearing. The hearing officer shall report his or her findings 3of fact, conclusions of law, and recommendations to the Board 4and the Secretary. The Board shall have 60 calendar days from 5receipt of the report to review the report of the hearing 6officer and present its findings of fact, conclusions of law, 7and recommendations to the Secretary. If the Board does not 8present its report within the 60-day period, the Secretary may 9issue an order based on the report of the hearing officer. If 10the Secretary disagrees with the recommendation of the Board 11or of the hearing officer, the Secretary may issue an order in 12contravention of the recommendation. The Secretary shall 13promptly provide a written report to the Board on any 14deviation, and shall specify the reasons for the action in the 15final order.16(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 17    (225 ILCS 745/140)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)19    Sec. 140. Surrender of license. Upon the revocation or 20suspension of a person's license to practice as a Licensed 21Professional Geologist, the licensee shall immediately 22surrender the person's his or her license to the Department 23and the licensee's name and address shall be added to the list 24of individuals whose licenses have been revoked, suspended, or 25denied renewal for cause. If the licensee fails to surrender   HB3331- 33 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1the his or her license, the Department has the right to seize 2the license.3(Source: P.A. 96-1327, eff. 7-27-10.) 4    (225 ILCS 745/160)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)6    Sec. 160. Violations. 7    (a) Using or attempting to use an expired license is a 8Class A misdemeanor.9    (b) Each of the following acts is a Class A misdemeanor for 10the first offense and a Class 4 felony for a second or 11subsequent offense:12        (1) A violation of any provision of this Act or its 13    rules, except as noted in subsection (a) of this Section.14        (2) The making of any willfully wilfully false oath or 15    affirmation in any matter or proceeding where an oath or 16    affirmation is required by this Act.17        (3) Using or attempting to use an inactive, suspended, 18    or revoked license or the license or seal of another, or 19    impersonating another licensee, or practicing geology as a 20    Licensed Professional Geologist in Illinois while one's 21    license is inactive, suspended, or revoked.22        (4) The practice, attempt to practice, or offer to 23    practice professional geology in Illinois without a 24    license as a Licensed Professional Geologist. Each day of 25    practicing professional geology or attempting to practice   HB3331- 34 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1    professional geology, and each instance of offering to 2    practice professional geology, without a license as a 3    Licensed Professional Geologist constitutes a separate 4    offense.5        (5) Advertising or displaying any sign or card or 6    other device that might indicate to the public that the 7    person or entity is entitled to practice as a Licensed 8    Professional Geologist, unless that person holds an active 9    license as a Licensed Professional Geologist in the State 10    of Illinois.11        (6) Fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment in 12    applying for or procuring a license under this Act, or in 13    connection with applying for the renewal of a license 14    under this Act Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license 15    by fraud.16        (7) The inability to practice with reasonable 17    judgment, skill, or safety as a result of habitual or 18    excessive use or addiction to alcohol, narcotics, 19    stimulants, or any other chemical agent or drug.20        (8) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 21    unprofessional conduct of a nature likely to deceive, 22    defraud, or harm the public.23        (9) A violation of any provision of this Act or any 24    rules adopted under this Act. 25(Source: P.A. 96-1327, eff. 7-27-10.)   HB3331- 35 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1    (225 ILCS 745/180)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 180. Confidentiality. All information collected by 4the Department in the course of an examination or 5investigation of a licensee or applicant, including, but not 6limited to, any complaint against a licensee filed with the 7Department and information collected to investigate any such 8complaint, shall be maintained for the confidential use of the 9Department and shall not be disclosed. The Department shall 10not disclose the information to anyone other than law 11enforcement officials, regulatory agencies that have an 12appropriate regulatory interest as determined by the 13Secretary, or a party presenting a lawful subpoena to the 14Department. Information and documents disclosed to a federal, 15State, county, or local law enforcement agency or regulatory 16agency shall not be disclosed by the agency for any purpose to 17any other agency or person. A formal complaint filed against a 18licensee by the Department or any order issued by the 19Department against a licensee or applicant shall be a public 20record, except as otherwise prohibited by law.21(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15.) 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Section and Section 5 23take effect upon becoming law.  HB3331- 36 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    5 ILCS 80/4.364    5 ILCS 80/4.43 new5    225 ILCS 745/156    225 ILCS 745/18 new7    225 ILCS 745/208    225 ILCS 745/259    225 ILCS 745/3010    225 ILCS 745/3511    225 ILCS 745/4012    225 ILCS 745/41 new13    225 ILCS 745/4514    225 ILCS 745/5015    225 ILCS 745/5416    225 ILCS 745/6517    225 ILCS 745/66 new18    225 ILCS 745/7519    225 ILCS 745/8020    225 ILCS 745/8521    225 ILCS 745/9022    225 ILCS 745/11023    225 ILCS 745/12024    225 ILCS 745/12525    225 ILCS 745/140  HB3331- 37 -LRB104 09147 AAS 19203 b1    225 ILCS 745/1602    225 ILCS 745/180